Utah statutes.
20A-6-101.   General requirements for paper ballots.

(1)  Each election officer shall ensure that paper ballots:

(a)  are printed on only one side of the paper;

(b)  are printed using precisely the same quality and tint of plain white paper through which the printing or writing cannot be seen;

(c)  are printed using precisely the same quality and kind of type;

(d)  are printed using precisely the same quality and tint of plain black ink;

(e)  are uniform in size for all the voting precincts within the election officer's jurisdiction;

(f)  include, in elections where write-in voting is authorized, a write-in column immediately adjacent to the last column on the ballot that is long enough to contain as many written names of candidates as there are persons to be elected with:

(i)  the offices to be filled printed above the blank spaces on the ticket; and

(ii)  the words "Write-In Voting Column" printed at the head of the column without a 1/2 inch circle.

(2)  Whenever the vote for candidates is to be limited to the voters of a particular political division, the election officer shall ensure that the names of those candidates are printed only upon those ballots provided to that political division.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2009 General Session

